Utah statutes.
70A-2-602.   Manner and effect of rightful rejection.

(1)  Rejection of goods must be within a reasonable time after their delivery
or tender. It is ineffective unless the buyer seasonably notifies the seller.
(2)  Subject to the provisions of the two following sections on rejected goods
(Sections 70A-2-603 and 70A-2-604),
(a)  after rejection any exercise of ownership by the buyer with respect to
any commercial unit is wrongful as against the seller; and
(b)  if the buyer has before rejection taken physical possession of goods in
which he does not have a security interest under the provisions of this
chapter (Subsection (3) of Section 70A-2-711), he is under a duty after
rejection to hold them with reasonable care at the seller's disposition for a
time sufficient to permit the seller to remove them; but
(c)  the buyer has no further obligations with regard to goods rightfully
rejected.
(3)  The seller's rights with respect to goods wrongfully rejected are
governed by the provisions of this chapter on seller's remedies in general
(Section 70A-2-703).
